North Carolina, session 2025, SB786.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Consumer Finance Awareness Initiative. – The Department of
Justice (Department) shall launch a statewide consumer finance awareness initiative to educate
the public about risks, including, but not limited to, phishing, mail fraud, identity theft, pyramid
schemes, predatory home-based business opportunities, and money transfer fraud. The initiative
required under this section shall include the development of (i) the website and toolkit required
under subsection (b) of this section and (ii) the outreach process required under subsection (c) of
this section.
SECTION 1.(b) Development of Website and Toolkit. – The Department shall
develop a website to provide information to the public about (i) the risks listed in subsection (a)
of this section, (ii) links to webpages for various resources related to consumer finance and
emerging schemes and fraudulent activities, and (iii) access to a toolkit of information that local
communities may use to launch consumer finance awareness initiatives at the local level. The
toolkit shall provide materials and resources that may be tailored to a community's needs and
used for launching local education and awareness campaigns, events, and local groups focused
on consumer finance awareness and the distribution of information related thereto. The website
and toolkit required under this section shall be developed by September 1, 2026.
SECTION 1.(c) Development of State-Coordinated Outreach. – Upon development
of the website and toolkit required under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall
develop and implement an outreach process for disseminating the information and toolkit
described in subsection (b) of this section to the public and to local communities, as well as the
provision of technical assistance to local communities to assist them in utilizing the toolkit to
launch local initiatives.
SECTION 1.(d) Use of Third-Party Entity. – The Department may contract with a
third-party entity with relevant expertise related to consumer finance to launch the awareness
initiative required under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.(e) Prohibition on Advocacy. – The awareness initiative required under
subsection (a) of this section and any State funds used to launch and maintain the initiative shall
not be used to advocate, promote, or lobby for the creation of new or the revision of existing laws
regulating consumer finance. The initiative and any State funds used to launch or maintain the
initiative shall only be used for the purposes set forth in subsections (b) through (d) of this section
and only to explain and promote existing laws and resources for consumer awareness and
protection.
*S786-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(f) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Justice the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in recurring funds beginning
in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to cover costs of the initiative.
SECTION 1.(g) Report. – The Department of Justice shall submit a report to the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety detailing the progress in
meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The report required under this
section shall be submitted by September 1, 2027.
SECTION 2.(a) Health and Civil Rights Awareness Initiative. – The Department of
Health and Human Services (Department) shall launch a statewide health and civil rights
awareness initiative to educate the public about the risks to public health and information
pertaining to issues including, but not limited to, reproductive, LGBTQIA+, gender, and racial
health issues. The initiative required under this section shall include the development of (i) the
website and toolkit required under subsection (b) of this section and (ii) the outreach process
required under subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 2.(b) Development of Website and Toolkit. – The Department shall
develop a website to provide information to the public about (i) the risks and issues listed in
subsection (a) of this section, (ii) links to webpages for various resources related to health and
civil rights, and (iii) access to a toolkit of information that local communities may use to launch
health and civil rights initiatives at the local level. The toolkit shall provide materials and
resources that may be tailored to a community's needs, distributed to local media outlets, and
used for launching local education and awareness campaigns, events, and local groups focused
on health and civil rights awareness and the distribution of information related thereto. The
website and toolkit required under this section shall be developed by September 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(c) Development of State-Coordinated Outreach. – Upon development
of the website and toolkit required under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall
develop and implement an outreach process for disseminating the information and toolkit
described in subsection (b) of this section to the public and to local communities, as well as the
provision of technical assistance to local communities to assist them in utilizing the toolkit to
launch local initiatives.
SECTION 2.(d) Use of Third-Party Entity. – The Department may contract with a
third-party entity with relevant expertise related to health and civil rights to launch the awareness
initiative required under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.(e) Prohibition on Advocacy. – The awareness initiative required under
subsection (a) of this section and any State funds used to launch and maintain the initiative shall
not be used to advocate, promote, or lobby for the creation of new or the revision of existing laws
regulating health and civil rights. The initiative and any State funds used to launch or maintain
the initiative shall only be used for the purposes set forth in subsections (b) through (d) of this
section and only to explain and promote existing laws and resources for health and civil rights.
SECTION 2.(f) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to cover costs of the initiative.
SECTION 2.(g) Report. – The Department of Health and Human Services shall
submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services
detailing the progress in meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The
report required under this section shall be submitted by September 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 786-First Edition